tests/N-nouns_n.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  "n-stem nouns":
    наһан<n><nom> :     наһан 
    наһан<n><gen> :     [наһанай, наһай]
    наһан<n><acc> :     наһыe 
    наһан<n><dat> :     [наһанда, наһада]
    наһан<n><abl> :     [наһанһаа, наһаһаа]
    наһан<n><ins> :     [наһанаар,  наһаар]
    наһан<n><pl><nom> :     наһад
    хурдан<n><nom> :     хурдан
    хурдан<n><gen> :     [хурданай, хурдай]
    хурдан<n><acc> :     хурдые 
    хурдан<n><dat> :     [хурданда, хурдада] 
    хурдан<n><abl> :     [хурданһаа, хурдаһаа]
    хурдан<n><ins> :     [хурданаар, хурдаар]
    хурдан<n><pl><nom> :     хурдад
    хэмжээн<n><nom> :     хэмжээн 
    хэмжээн<n><gen> :     [хэмжээнэй, хэмжээй] 
    хэмжээн<n><acc> :     хэмжээе 
    хэмжээн<n><dat> :     [хэмжээндэ, хэмжээдэ] 
    хэмжээн<n><abl> :     [хэмжээнһээ, хэмжээһээ]
    хэмжээн<n><ins> :     [хэмжээнээр, хэмжээр]
    хэмжээн<n><pl><nom> : хэмжээд

  "n-stem nouns with нар plural":
    хулгайш<n><nom> :     хулгайш
    хулгайш<n><gen> :     [хулгайшанай, хулгайшай]
    хулгайш<n><acc> :     хулгайшыe 
    хулгайш<n><dat> :     [хулгайшанда, хулгайшада]
    хулгайш<n><abl> :     [хулгайшанһаа, хулгайшаһаа]
    хулгайш<n><ins> :     [хулгайшанаар, хулгайшаар]
    хулгайш<n><pl><nom> :     хулгайшанар
